Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201582-602
Purposes of act.

The purposes of the Nebraska Agritourism Promotion Act are to:

(1) Promote tourism and rural economic development by encouraging owners of farms, ranches, and other rural land, including agricultural, historical, ecological, cultural, and natural attractions, to allow access to members of the public for educational, entertainment, and recreational purposes;

(2) Promote a better understanding by visitors of agricultural operations and features, including the production of livestock and agricultural products, the land and other natural attributes, and wildlife; and

(3) Encourage agritourism activities by limiting civil liability of owners of farms, ranches, and other rural land.

Laws 2015, LB329, § 2.